Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4796.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to provide for the militia of this state and its organization, command, personnel, administration, training, supply, discipline, deployment, employment, and retirement; to regulate the deployment of armed military forces of other states, territories, or districts within this state; and to repeal acts and parts of acts. Sec. 132. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), an armed military force from another state, territory, or district shall not enter this state for the purpose of performing military duty in this state without the permission of the governor. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to an armed military force that is in the service of the United States and is acting under authority that is validly invoked by the President of the United States.